Ohio, session 136, HB638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.59 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.59. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of interstate route number seventy from mile marker ninety-eight to mile marker one hundred, in Franklin county, shall be known as the "President Donald Trump Freedom Highway." The director of transportation shall construct suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.